District of Columbia statutes.
38-2603

Requirements for short-term SEO plan.

The short-term SEO plan shall:

(1)

Be formulated in consultation with the Board of Education, the Superintendent of Schools, the Public Charter School Board, District agencies with responsibilities for functions specified in § 38-2602, the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority (“DCFRMAA”) and any relevant federal agencies;

(2)

Be adopted by the Officer only after at least one public hearing on the proposed short-term plan;

(3)

Identify the authority and responsibility of each party at each stage in the transition process;

(4)

Specify dates and benchmarks for transfer of authority, responsibility, budget, and employees;

(5)

Specify the estimated cost to the SEO of carrying out each function specified in § 38-2602, and the recommended source of revenues; and

(6)

Identify any factors with potential for disrupting services to students and recommend steps to prevent any possible disruption.

History

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 4, 47 DCR 6835